Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AITKIN COUNTY HISTORICAL SOCIETY.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Minnesota Historical Society for a grant to the Aitkin County Historical Society for replacement of the roof on the Aitkin County Historical Society facility located at 20 Pacific Street in the city of Aitkin. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end